Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201881-3436.01
Combined services with construction services; authorized; conditions.

(1) Providing combined services involving the practice of architecture or engineering, or both, with construction services is allowed if:

(a) An architect participates substantially in, and has direct supervision of, the architectural services provided on the project;

(b) A professional engineer participates substantially in, and has direct supervision of, the engineering services provided on the project; and

(c) The rendering of architectural or professional engineering services conforms to the Engineers and Architects Regulation Act and the rules and regulations.

(2) A temporary permit holder under the act may perform engineering or architectural services pursuant to this section.

Laws 2015, LB23, § 34.